Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,123
Hearing on application and map.

The Chief Water Officer may hold a hearing on the application for transfer and map under section 46-2,122 if the Chief Water Officer determines that a hearing is necessary to determine whether the application for transfer and map are in compliance with such section. The Chief Water Officer shall hold a hearing on the application if requested by any owner of land within the district or served by the company. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with section 61-206 and the rules and regulations of the Chief Water Officer.

Laws 1995, LB 99, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 155;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 139.